Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.500

Student financial aid programs—Administration by office—College information web-based portal.

(1) The office shall administer any state program or state-administered federal program of student financial aid now or hereafter established.

(2) Each of the student financial aid programs administered by the office shall be labeled an "opportunity pathway." Loans provided by the federal government and aid granted to students outside of the financial aid package provided through institutions of higher education are not subject to the labeling provisions in this subsection. All communication materials, including, but not limited to, printed materials, presentations, and web content, shall include the "opportunity pathway" label.

(3) If the office develops a one-stop college information web-based portal that includes financial, academic, and career planning information, the portal shall display all available student financial aid programs, except federal student loans and aid granted to students outside of the financial aid package provided through institutions of higher education, under the "opportunity pathway" label. The portal shall also display information regarding federal tax credits related to higher education available for students or their families.

(4) The labeling requirements in this section do not change the source, eligibility requirements, or student obligations associated with each program. The office shall customize its communications to differentiate between programs, eligibility requirements, and student obligations, so long as the reporting provisions of this chapter are also fulfilled.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 106; 2009 c 215 s 7; 1985 c 370 s 23; 1975 1st ex.s. c 132 s 15. Prior: 1969 ex.s. c 263 s 7. Formerly RCW 28B.80.240, 28.90.160, 28B.81.070.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2009 c 215: See notes following RCW 28B.92.030.

Effective date—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 132: See notes following RCW 28B.77.060.